packages/commonvoice-utils/commonvoice_utils-0.2.16-py3-none-any.whl/cvutils/data/hi/phon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>

LEXICON Root

Cns ;
Vow ;

LEXICON Loop

Cns ;
Vow ;
 # ;

LEXICON Cns

क:k MaybeVowCns ; 
ख:kʰ MaybeVowCns ; 
ग:ɡ MaybeVowCns ; 
घ:ɡʱ MaybeVowCns ; 
ङ:ŋ MaybeVowCns ; 
ह:ɦ MaybeVowCns ; 
च:tʃ MaybeVowCns ; 
छ:tʃʰ MaybeVowCns ; 
ज:dʒ MaybeVowCns ; 
झ:ɟʱ MaybeVowCns ; 
झ:dʒʱ MaybeVowCns ; 
ञ:ɲ MaybeVowCns ; 
य:j MaybeVowCns ; 
श:ʃ MaybeVowCns ; 
ट:ʈ MaybeVowCns ; 
ठ:ʈʰ MaybeVowCns ; 
ड:ɖ MaybeVowCns ; 
ढ:ɖʱ MaybeVowCns ; 
ण:ɳ MaybeVowCns ; 
र:r MaybeVowCns ; 
ष:ʃ MaybeVowCns ; 
त:t̪ MaybeVowCns ; 
थ:t̪ʰ MaybeVowCns ; 
द:d̪ MaybeVowCns ; 
ध:d̪ʱ MaybeVowCns ; 
न:n MaybeVowCns ; 
ल:l MaybeVowCns ; 
स:s MaybeVowCns ; 
प:p MaybeVowCns ; 
फ:pʰ MaybeVowCns ; 
ब:b MaybeVowCns ; 
भ:bʱ MaybeVowCns ; 
म:m MaybeVowCns ; 
व:ʋ MaybeVowCns ; 

LEXICON Vow

अ:ə Loop ; 
आ:aː Loop ; 
इ:ɪ Loop ; 
ई:iː Loop ; 
उ:ʊ Loop ; 
ऊ:uː Loop ; 
ए:eː Loop ; 
ऐ:ɛː Loop ; 
ओ:oː Loop ; 
औ:ɔː Loop ; 

LEXICON MaybeVowCns

Cns "weight: 1.0" ;
MaybeVow ;
़: Cns ;
़: MaybeVow ;

LEXICON MaybeVow

:ə Loop ; 
ा:ə Loop ; 
ा:aː Loop ; 
ि:ɪ Loop ; 
ी:iː Loop ; 
ु:ʊ Loop ; 
ू:uː Loop ; 
े:eː Loop ; 
ै:ɛː Loop ; 
ो:oː Loop ; 
ौ:ɔː Loop ; 
 Loop ;
